Utah statutes.
65A-8-101.   Division responsibilities for fire control and the preservation of forest, watershed, and other lands -- Reciprocal agreements for fire protection.

(1)  The division shall determine and execute the best method for protecting private and public property by:

(a)  except as provided by Subsection (1)(e), preventing the origin and spread of fire on nonfederal forest, range, or watershed land in an unincorporated area of the state;

(b)  protecting a nonfederal forest or watershed area using conservation principles;

(c)  encouraging a private landowner to preserve, protect, and manage forest or other land throughout the state;

(d)  taking action the division considers appropriate to control wildland fire and protect life and property on the nonfederal forest, range, or watershed land within an unincorporated area of the state; and

(e)  implementing a limited fire suppression strategy, including allowing a fire to burn with limited or modified suppression, if the division determines that the strategy is appropriate for a specific area or circumstance.

(2)  The division may:

(a)  enter into an agreement with a public or private agency or individual:

(i)  for the purpose of protecting, managing, or rehabilitating land owned or managed by the agency or individual; and

(ii)  establishing a predetermined fire suppression plan, including a limited fire suppression strategy, for a specific fire management area; and

(b)  enter into a reciprocal agreement with a fire protection organization, including a federal agency, to provide fire protection for land and an improvement for which the organization normally provides fire protection.



Amended by Chapter 20, 2008 General Session

